Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2808
Property; unpaid taxes and costs; cancellation; when.

If after all proceeds have been distributed and there still remains unpaid any portion of taxes, interest and penalties and costs thereon, the county shall by official action cause all such taxes, interest, and penalties and costs, regardless of whether such are for the benefit of the state or any political subdivision, to be stricken from the records of the county. Such action shall forever release such property from such taxes, interest, penalties, and costs thereon.

Laws 1967, c. 483, § 8, p. 1496.